Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.185C.010 and 2023 c 277 s 2 and 2023 c 151 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center.(2) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department of children, youth, and families seeking adjudication of placement of the child.(3) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.(4) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.(5) "Department" means the department of commerce.(6) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.(7) "Home security fund account" means the state treasury account receiving income from revenue under RCW 36.22.250(2)(c), and all other sources directed to the homeless housing and assistance program.(8) "Homeless housing grant program" means the vehicle by which competitive grants are awarded by the department, utilizing moneys from the home security fund account, to local governments for programs directly related to housing homeless individuals and families, addressing the root causes of homelessness, preventing homelessness, collecting data on homeless individuals, and other efforts directly related to housing homeless persons.(9) "Homeless housing plan" means the five-year plan developed by the county or other local government to address housing for homeless persons.(10) "Homeless housing program" means the program authorized under this chapter as administered by the department at the state level and by the local government or its designated subcontractor at the local level.(11) "Homeless housing strategic plan" means the five-year plan developed by the department, in consultation with the interagency council on homelessness, the affordable housing advisory board, and the state advisory council on homelessness.(12) "Homeless person" means an individual living outside or in a building not meant for human habitation or which they have no legal right to occupy, in an emergency shelter, or in a temporary housing program which may include a transitional and supportive housing program if habitation time limits exist. This definition includes substance abusers, people with mental illness, and sex offenders who are homeless.(13) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families to provide temporary residential placement and other services to ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth. ((A street))An unaccompanied homeless youth may remain in a HOPE center for 90 days while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth may stay longer than 90 days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. ((A street))An unaccompanied homeless youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not longer. All other ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth must have court approval under chapter 13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to 90 days.(14) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations created by chapter 35.82 RCW.(15) "Housing continuum" means the progression of individuals along a housing-focused continuum with homelessness at one end and homeownership at the other.(16) "Interagency council on homelessness" means a committee appointed by the governor and consisting of, at least, policy level representatives of the following entities: (a) The department of commerce; (b) the department of corrections; (c) the department of children, youth, and families; (d) the department of veterans affairs; and (e) the department of health.(17) "Local government" means a county government in the state of Washington or a city government, if the legislative authority of the city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for housing homeless persons within its borders.(18) "Local homeless housing task force" means a voluntary local committee created to advise a local government on the creation of a local homeless housing plan and participate in a local homeless housing program. It must include a representative of the county, a representative of the largest city located within the county, at least one homeless or formerly homeless person, such other members as may be required to maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing programs and services and if feasible, a representative of a private nonprofit organization with experience in low-income housing.(19) "Long-term private or public housing" means subsidized and unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in which there is no established time limit for habitation of less than two years.(20) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing specific measures of success against ultimate and interim goals.(21) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving without permission of the facility staff.(22) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility including, but not limited to, crisis residential centers or specialized foster family homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the facility administrator, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator, where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave, his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her return to the center.(23) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility licensed under rules adopted by the department of children, youth, and families with a ratio of at least one adult staff member to every two children.(24) "Street outreach services" means a program that provides services and resources either directly or through referral to ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth and ((unaccompanied)) young adults as defined in RCW 43.330.702. Services including crisis intervention, emergency supplies, case management, and referrals may be provided through community-based outreach or drop-in centers.(25) "Washington homeless census" means an annual statewide census conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties, community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the technical support and coordination of the department, to count and collect data on all homeless individuals in Washington.(26) "Washington homeless client management information system" means a database of information about homeless individuals in the state used to coordinate resources to assist homeless clients to obtain and retain housing and reach greater levels of self-sufficiency or economic independence when appropriate, depending upon their individual situations.Sec. 2. RCW 43.185C.280 and 2015 c 69 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The administrator of a designated crisis residential center shall perform the duties under subsection (3) of this section:(a) Upon admitting a child who has been brought to the center by a law enforcement officer under RCW 43.185C.265;(b) Upon admitting a child who has run away from home or has requested admittance to the center;(c) Upon learning from a person under RCW 13.32A.082 that the person is providing shelter to a child absent from home; or(d) Upon learning that a child has been placed with a responsible adult pursuant to RCW 43.185C.265.(2) Transportation expenses of the child shall be at the parent's expense to the extent of his or her ability to pay, with any unmet transportation expenses assumed by the crisis residential center.(3) When any of the circumstances under subsection (1) of this section are present, the administrator of a center shall perform the following duties:(a) Immediately notify the child's parent of the child's whereabouts, physical and emotional condition, and the circumstances surrounding his or her placement, unless a compelling reason exists as defined in RCW 13.32A.082;(b) Initially notify the parent that it is the paramount concern of the family reconciliation service personnel to achieve a reconciliation between the parent and child to reunify the family and inform the parent as to the procedures to be followed under this chapter;(c) Inform the parent whether a referral to children's protective services has been made and, if so, inform the parent of the standard pursuant to RCW 26.44.020(1) governing child abuse and neglect in this state; and either(d)(i) Arrange transportation for the child to the residence of the parent, as soon as practicable, when the child and his or her parent agrees to the child's return home or when the parent produces a copy of a court order entered under this chapter requiring the child to reside in the parent's home; or(ii) Arrange transportation for the child to: (A) An out-of-home placement which may include a licensed group care facility or foster family when agreed to by the child and parent; or (B) a certified or licensed mental health or chemical dependency program of the parent's choice.(4) If the administrator of the crisis residential center performs the duties listed in subsection (3) of this section, he or she shall also notify the department of social and health services that a child has been admitted to the crisis residential center.Sec. 3. RCW 43.185C.285 and 2018 c 58 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:The administrator of a crisis residential center shall notify parents unless a compelling reason exists as defined in RCW 13.32A.082, and the appropriate law enforcement agency as to any unauthorized leave from the center by a child placed at the center. The administrator shall also notify the department of children, youth, and families immediately as to any unauthorized leave from the center by a child who is in the care of or receiving services from the department of children, youth, and families.Sec. 4. RCW 43.185C.315 and 2019 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish HOPE centers across the state and may establish HOPE centers by contract, within funds appropriated by the legislature specifically for this purpose. HOPE centers shall be operated in a manner to reasonably assure that ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth placed there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the facility administrator, residents may come and go from the facility at reasonable hours such that no residents are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. The facility administrator, where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave, his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her return to the HOPE center. Any ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth who runs away from a HOPE center shall not be readmitted unless specifically authorized by the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth's placement and liaison specialist, and the placement and liaison specialist shall document with specific factual findings an appropriate basis for readmitting any ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth to a HOPE center. HOPE centers are required to have the following:(a) A license issued by the department of children, youth, and families, including staff who meet licensing qualifications;(b) A case manager who may be a contractual or a part-time employee, but must be available to work with ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth in a HOPE center at a ratio of one to every ((fifteen))15 youth staying in a HOPE center. This case manager shall be known as a placement and liaison specialist. Preference shall be given to those case managers who have experience working with adolescents and are cross-credentialed in mental health and chemical dependency. The placement and liaison specialist shall:(i) Conduct an assessment of the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth that includes a determination of the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth's legal status regarding residential placement;(ii) Facilitate the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth's return to his or her legally authorized residence at the earliest possible date or initiate processes to arrange legally authorized appropriate placement. Any ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth who may meet the definition of dependent child under RCW 13.34.030 must be referred to the department of children, youth, and families. The department of children, youth, and families shall determine whether a dependency petition should be filed under chapter 13.34 RCW. A shelter care hearing must be held within ((seventy-two))72 hours to authorize out-of-home placement for any youth the department of children, youth, and families determines is appropriate for out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW. All of the provisions of chapter 13.32A RCW must be followed for children in need of services or at-risk youth;(iii) Interface with other relevant resources and system representatives to secure long-term residential placement and other needed services for the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth;(iv) Be assigned immediately to each youth and meet with the youth within eight hours of the youth receiving HOPE center services;(v) Facilitate a physical examination of any ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth who has not seen a physician within one year prior to residence at a HOPE center and facilitate evaluation by a county-designated mental health professional, a chemical dependency specialist, or both if appropriate; and(vi) Arrange an educational assessment to measure the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth's competency level in reading, writing, and basic mathematics, and that will measure learning disabilities or special needs;(c) Staff trained in development needs of ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth as determined by the department, including but not limited to an on-site program manager who must work with the placement and liaison specialist to provide appropriate services on-site;(d) A data collection system that measures outcomes for the population served, and enables research and evaluation that can be used for future program development and service delivery. Data collection systems must have confidentiality rules and protocols developed by the department;(e) Notification requirements that meet the notification requirements of chapter 13.32A RCW. The youth's arrival date and time must be logged at intake by HOPE center staff. The staff must immediately notify law enforcement and dependency caseworkers if ((a street))an unaccompanied homeless youth runs away from a HOPE center. A child may be transferred to a secure facility as defined in RCW 13.32A.030 whenever the staff reasonably believes that ((a street))an unaccompanied homeless youth is likely to leave the HOPE center and not return after full consideration of the factors set forth in RCW 43.185C.290(2)(a) (i) and (ii). The ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth's temporary placement in the HOPE center must be authorized by the court or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families if the youth is a dependent of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW or the department of children, youth, and families is responsible for the youth under chapter 13.32A RCW, or by the youth's parent or legal custodian, until such time as the parent can retrieve the youth who is returning to home;(f) HOPE centers must identify to the department of children, youth, and families any ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth it serves who is not returning promptly to home. The department of children, youth, and families then must contact the missing children's clearinghouse identified in chapter 13.60 RCW and either report the youth's location or report that the youth is the subject of a dependency action and the parent should receive notice from the department of children, youth, and families; and(g) Services that provide counseling and education to the ((street))unaccompanied homeless youth.(2) The department shall award contracts for the operation of HOPE center beds with the goal of facilitating the coordination of services provided for youth by such programs and those services provided by secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers.(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the department must incrementally increase the number of available HOPE beds by at least ((seventeen))17 beds in fiscal year 2017, at least ((seventeen))17 beds in fiscal year 2018, and at least ((seventeen))17 beds in fiscal year 2019, such that by July 1, 2019, ((seventy-five))75 HOPE beds are established and operated throughout the state as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.(4) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the beds available in HOPE centers shall be increased incrementally. The additional capacity shall be distributed around the state based upon need and, to the extent feasible, shall be geographically situated so that HOPE beds are available across the state. In determining the need for increased numbers of HOPE beds in a particular county or counties, one of the considerations should be the volume of truancy petitions filed there.Sec. 5. RCW 43.185C.320 and 2017 c 277 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:To be eligible for placement in a HOPE center, a minor must be either ((a street))an unaccompanied homeless youth((, as that term is defined in this chapter,)) or a youth who, without placement in a HOPE center, will continue to participate in increasingly risky behavior, including truancy. Youth may also self-refer to a HOPE center.Sec. 6. RCW 43.185C.340 and 2023 c 386 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall administer a grant program that links students experiencing homelessness and their families with stable housing located in the student's school district. The goals of the program are to:(a) Provide educational stability for students experiencing homelessness by promoting housing stability; and(b) Encourage the development of collaborative strategies between housing and education partners.(2) To ensure that innovative strategies between housing and education partners are developed and implemented, the department may contract and consult with a designated vendor to provide technical assistance and program evaluation, assist with making grant awards, and support collaboration between the department and the office of the superintendent of public instruction. If the department contracts with a vendor, the vendor must be selected by the director and:(a) Be a nonprofit vendor;(b) Be located in Washington state; and(c) Have a demonstrated record of working toward the housing and educational stability of students and families experiencing homelessness.(3) In implementing the program, the department, or the department in partnership with its designated vendor, shall consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(4)(a) The department, or the designated vendor in consultation with the department, shall develop a competitive grant process to make grant awards to eligible organizations on implementation of the proposal. For the purposes of this subsection, "eligible organization" means any local government, local housing authority, behavioral health administrative services organization established under chapter 71.24 RCW, behavioral health organization, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization, federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of Washington, or regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance organization. Applications for the grant program must include a letter of support from the applicable school districts. Within 60 days of receiving a grant award under this section, a memorandum of understanding must be established between the housing providers and school districts defining the responsibilities and commitments of each party to identify, house, and support students experiencing homelessness. The memorandum must include:(i) How housing providers will partner with school districts to address gaps and needs and develop sustainable strategies to help students experiencing homelessness; and(ii) How data on students experiencing homelessness and their families will be collected and shared in accordance with privacy protections under applicable federal and state laws.(b) If a memorandum of understanding cannot be established as required by (a) of this subsection, the housing provider and school districts may work with the department on a case-by-case basis to provide, in lieu of a memorandum of understanding, a detailed accountability plan for a partnership between the housing provider and the school districts.(5) In determining which eligible organizations will receive grants, the department must ensure that selected grantees reflect geographic diversity across the state. Greater weight shall be given to eligible organizations that demonstrate a commitment to:(a) Partnering with local schools or school districts as demonstrated by a letter of support; and(b) Developing and implementing evidence-informed strategies to address racial inequities. Specific strategies may include, but are not limited to:(i) Hiring direct service staff who reflect the racial, cultural, and language demographics of the population being served;(ii) Committing to inclusive programming by intentionally seeking and utilizing input from the population being served;(iii) Ensuring eligibility criteria does not unintentionally screen out people of color and further racial inequity; and(iv) Creating access points in locations frequented by parents, guardians, and unaccompanied homeless youth of color.(6) Activities eligible for assistance under this grant program include but are not limited to:(a) Rental assistance, which includes utilities, security and utility deposits, first and last month's rent, rental application fees, moving expenses, and other eligible expenses to be determined by the department;(b) Transportation assistance, including gasoline assistance for students and families with vehicles and bus passes;(c) Emergency shelter;(d) Housing stability case management; and(e) Other collaborative housing strategies, including prevention and strength-based safety and housing approaches.(7)(a) All beneficiaries of funds from the grant program must be from households that include at least one student experiencing homelessness as defined as a child or youth ((without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence in accordance with the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11431 through 11435))who is homeless as defined in RCW 43.330.702.(b) For the purposes of this section, "student experiencing homelessness" includes unaccompanied homeless youth not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian. "Unaccompanied homeless youth" includes students up to the age of twenty-one, in alignment with the qualifications for school admissions under RCW 28A.225.160(1).(8)(a) Grantee organizations must compile and report information to the department. The department shall report to the legislature the findings of the grantee, the housing stability of the homeless families, and any related policy recommendations.(b) Grantees must track and report on the following measures including, but not limited to:(i) Length of time enrolled in the grant program;(ii) Housing destination at program exit;(iii) Type of residence prior to enrollment in the grant program; and(iv) Number of times homeless in the past three years.(c) Grantees must also include in their reports a narrative description discussing its partnership with school districts as set forth in the memorandum outlined in subsection (4) of this section. Reports must also include the kinds of supports grantees are providing students and families to support academic learning.(d) Data on all program participants must be entered into and tracked through the Washington homeless client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180.(9) In order to ensure that housing providers are meeting the requirements of the grant program for students experiencing homelessness, the department, or the department in partnership with its designee, shall monitor the program at least once every two years.(10) Any program review and monitoring under this section may be conducted concurrently with other program reviews and monitoring conducted by the department. In its review, the department, or the department in partnership with its designee, shall monitor program components that include the process used by the eligible organization to identify and reach out to students experiencing homelessness, and other indicators to determine how well the eligible organization is meeting the housing needs of students experiencing homelessness. The department, or the department in partnership with its designee, shall provide technical assistance and support to housing providers to better implement the program.(11) The department is subject to the requirements established in RCW 28A.300.542(9).Sec. 7. RCW 43.330.702 and 2015 c 69 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Child," "juvenile," "youth," and "minor" means any unemancipated individual who is under the chronological age of ((eighteen))18 years. A homeless young adult under age 21 residing in a transitional living program for unaccompanied homeless youth at the time the young adult reaches the age of 18 may be considered a child for the purposes of continued placement in licensed group care facilities under chapter 74.15 RCW. A young adult who is not dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW is not considered a "child" under any other section or for any other purpose.(2) "Homeless" means without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, P.L. 100â77, July 22, 1987, 101 Stat. 482, and runaway and homeless youth act, P.L. 93â415, Title III, September 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1129.(3) "Runaway" means an unmarried and unemancipated minor who is absent from the home of a parent or guardian or other lawful placement without the consent of the parent, guardian, or lawful custodian.(4) (("Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her legally authorized residence.(5))) "Unaccompanied" means a youth or young adult experiencing homelessness while not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.(((6)))(5) "Young adult" means a person between ((eighteen))18 and ((twenty-four))24 years of age. An emancipated minor may be considered a young adult for the purposes of eligibility for programs administered by the office of homeless youth.Sec. 8. RCW 43.330.710 and 2019 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall report to the director or the director's designee.(b)(i) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs may distribute grants to providers who serve homeless youth and young adults throughout the state.(ii) The grants must fund services in the five key components in RCW 43.330.700.(iii) The grants must be expended on a statewide basis and may be used to support direct services, as well as technical assistance, evaluation, and capacity building.(iv) Grant funds used to provide flexible financial assistance may be provided directly to eligible youth and young adults or a third-party vendor such as a landlord in order to promote the housing stability of the program participant.(2) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide management and oversight guidance and direction to the following programs:(a) HOPE centers as described in RCW 43.185C.315;(b) Crisis residential centers as described in RCW 43.185C.295;(c) Street outreach services as defined in RCW 43.185C.010;(d) Independent youth housing programs as described in RCW 43.63A.305.Sec. 9. RCW 43.330.724 and 2022 c 137 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall select, monitor, and provide funding and assistance ((for a minimum of six total))to counties that implement housing stability for youth in ((crisis))courts programs as described in this section ((for a period of three years)).(2) The housing stability for youth in ((crisis))courts pilot programs must include the following components:(a) Regular trainings provided to all appropriate juvenile court staff regarding risk factors and identifiers for youth homelessness;(b) An identification and referral system used throughout the juvenile court system where all appropriate court staff use routine data flags to identify youth at risk for youth homelessness and refer youth to the housing stability coordinator described under (c) of this subsection;(c) A dedicated housing stability coordinator in each participating county that receives referrals, conducts housing stability assessments with youth and caregivers, connects youth and caregivers with relevant community providers based on assessments, and follows up on referrals;(d) A model of homelessness prevention services that provides the appropriate amount of intervention based on the youth or family needs; and(e) Coordinated housing services for youth experiencing homelessness.(3) By October 1, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature and the governor that includes:(a) An evaluation of the housing stability for youth in ((crisis))courts programs that includes outcome data for participants;(b) Recommendations for improving the housing stability for youth in ((crisis))courts programs; and(c) Recommendation for expanding the housing stability for youth in ((crisis))courts programs.(((4) This section expires July 1, 2026.))Sec. 10. RCW 43.330.726 and 2023 c 151 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide additional funding and assistance to contracted youth service providers or other entities who convene a community support team as described in this section. The purpose of the community support team is to help identify supports for a youth focused on resolving family conflict and obtaining or maintaining long-term and stable housing. (((a))) The community support team is required to prioritize reunification between the youth and the youth's family to the extent possible without endangering the health, safety, or welfare of the child.(((b) The community support team may not engage with a family member other than the youth if the parent, guardian, or legal custodian objects to the support or assistance that is offered or provided.))(2) A community support team under this section must include:(a) The youth; and(b) Supportive adults identified by the youth, which may include:(i) Licensed shelter staff;(ii) A case manager;(iii) Individuals from the youth's school;(iv) Juvenile court staff;(v) The youth's attorney;(vi) Behavioral health providers;(vii) Community support providers;(viii) Family members;(ix) Mentors;(x) Peer support;(xi) Housing navigation;(xii) Legal assistance; or(xiii) Other community members.(3) The community support team described in this section shall develop a process that allows youth who enter a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another ((licensed)) organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families to request assistance from the community support team.(4) Any youth who ((enters))seeks services from a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another ((licensed)) organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families in an area served by the community support team is eligible for the community support team.(5) The community support team described in this section shall coordinate efforts, if appropriate, with:(a) The department or the designated contractor of the department providing family reconciliation services to a youth or family;(b) Multidisciplinary teams established under RCW 43.185C.250 and 43.185C.255; and(c) Other nearby youth homelessness assistance programs that may provide assistance to the youth.Sec. 11. RCW 43.63A.305 and 2009 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The independent youth housing program is created in the department to provide housing stipends to eligible youth to be used for independent housing. In developing a plan for the design, implementation, and operation of the independent youth housing program, the department shall:(a) Adopt policies, requirements, and procedures necessary to administer the program;(b) Contract with one or more eligible organizations described under RCW 43.185A.040 to provide services and conduct administrative activities as described in subsection (3) of this section;(c) Establish eligibility criteria for youth to participate in the independent youth housing program, giving priority to youth who have been dependents of the state for at least one year;(d) Refer interested youth to the designated subcontractor organization administering the program in the area in which the youth intends to reside;(e) Develop a method for determining the amount of the housing stipend, first and last month's rent, and security deposit, where applicable, to be dedicated to participating youth. The method for determining a housing stipend must take into account a youth's age, the youth's total income from all sources, the fair market rent for the area in which the youth lives or intends to live, and a variety of possible living situations for the youth. The amount of housing stipends must be adjusted, by a method and formula established by the department, to promote the successful transition for youth to complete housing self-sufficiency over time;(f) Ensure that the independent youth housing program is integrated and aligned with other state rental assistance and case management programs operated by the department, as well as case management and supportive services programs, including the independent living program, the transitional living program, and other related programs offered by the department of social and health services; and(g) Consult with the department of social and health services and other stakeholders involved with dependent youth, homeless youth, and homeless young adults, as appropriate.(2) The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families shall collaborate with the department in implementing and operating the independent youth housing program including, but not limited to, the following:(a) Refer potential eligible youth to the department before the youth's ((eighteenth))18th birthday, if feasible, to include an indication, if known, of where the youth plans to reside after aging out of foster care;(b) Provide information to all youth aged ((fifteen))15 or older, who are dependents of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW, about the independent youth housing program, encouraging dependents nearing their ((eighteenth))18th birthday to consider applying for enrollment in the program;(c) Encourage organizations participating in the independent living program and the transitional living program to collaborate with independent youth housing program providers whenever possible to capitalize on resources and provide the greatest amount and variety of services to eligible youth;(d) Annually provide to the department data reflecting changes in the percentage of youth aging out of the state dependency system each year who are eligible for state assistance, as well as any other data and performance measures that may assist the department to measure program success; and(e) Annually, beginning by December 31, 2007, provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the interagency council on homelessness as described under RCW 43.185C.170 recommendations of strategies to reach the goals described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g).(3) Under the independent youth housing program, subcontractor organizations shall:(a) Use moneys awarded to the organizations for housing stipends, security deposits, first and last month's rent stipends, case management program costs, costs associated with providing transitional housing, and administrative costs. When subcontractor organizations determine that it is necessary to assist participating youth in accessing and maintaining independent housing, subcontractor organizations may also use moneys awarded to pay for professional mental health services and tuition costs for court-ordered classes and programs;(((i) Administrative costs for each subcontractor organization may not exceed twelve percent of the estimated total annual grant amount to the subcontractor organization;(ii) All housing stipends, security deposits, and first and last month's rent stipends must be payable only to a landlord or housing manager of any type of independent housing;))(b) Enroll eligible youth who are referred by the department and who choose to reside in their assigned service area;(c) Enter eligible youth program participants into the (([Washington]))Washington homeless client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180;(d) Monitor participating youth's housing status;(e) Evaluate participating youth's eligibility and compliance with department policies and procedures at least twice a year;(f) Assist participating youth to develop or update an independent living plan focused on obtaining and retaining independent housing or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth has an independent living plan;(g) Educate participating youth on tenant rights and responsibilities;(h) Provide support to participating youth in the form of general case management and information and referral services, when necessary, or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is receiving the case management and information and referral services needed;(i) Connect participating youth, when possible, with individual development account programs, other financial literacy programs, and other programs that are designed to help young people acquire economic independence and self-sufficiency, or collaborate with a case manager with whom the youth is already involved to ensure that the youth is receiving information and referrals to these programs, when appropriate;(j) Submit expenditure and performance reports, including information related to the performance measures in RCW 43.63A.311, to the department on a time schedule determined by the department; and(k) Provide recommendations to the department regarding program improvements and strategies that might assist the state to reach its goals as described in RCW 43.63A.311(2)(g).Sec. 12. RCW 74.15.020 and 2023 c 441 s 4 and 2023 c 408 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, facility, or residential private school, which receives children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for services rendered:(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency, which places a child or children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community facility;(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency, which is a temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW 43.185C.295 through 43.185C.310;(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for up to ((seventy-two))72 hours to children who have been admitted by their parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite centers may operate for up to ((twenty-four))24 hours a day, and for up to seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for children ages birth through ((seventeen))17, and for persons ((eighteen))18 through ((twenty))20 with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling or siblings through age ((seventeen))17. Emergency respite centers may not substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other services defined under this section, and may not substitute for services, which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;(e) "Foster family home" means an agency, which regularly provides care on a ((twenty-four))24 hour basis to one or more children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is placed;(f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group of children on a ((twenty-four))24 hour basis. "Group care facility" includes but is not limited to:(i) Qualified residential treatment programs as defined in RCW 13.34.030;(ii) Facilities specializing in providing prenatal, postpartum, or parenting supports for youth; and(iii) Facilities providing high quality residential care and supportive services to children who are, or who are at risk of becoming, victims of sex trafficking;(g) "HOPE center" ((means an agency licensed by the secretary to provide temporary residential placement and other services to street youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter 13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days))has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185C.010;(h) "Maternity service" means an agency, which provides or arranges for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their infants after confinement;(i) "Residential private school" means a nonpublic school or nonpublic school district subject to approval by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130 and chapter 28A.195 RCW that provides sleeping and living facilities or residential accommodations for enrolled students;(j) "Resource and assessment center" means an agency that provides short-term emergency and crisis care for a period up to ((seventy-two))72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays to children who have been removed from their parent's or guardian's care by child protective services or law enforcement;(k) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by the secretary that provides residential and transitional living services to persons ages ((sixteen))16 to ((eighteen))18 who are dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor. Dependent minors ages ((fourteen))14 and ((fifteen))15 may be eligible if no other placement alternative is available and the department approves the placement;(l) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with developmental disability in the following ways:(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection (2), even after the marriage is terminated;(v) Relatives, as named in (a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection (2), of any half sibling of the child; or(vi) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of ((eighteen))18 and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a ((twenty-four-hour))24 hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother, or persons with developmental disabilities;(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person providing care on a ((twenty-four-hour))24 hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar services to exchange students or international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of an exchange student in their home;(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar services to international children who have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for medical care as established by the United States citizenship and immigration services, or persons who have the care of such an international child in their home;(f) Nonresidential schools, which are engaged primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children and do not accept custody of children;(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ((ten))10 years prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an endowment or trust fund;(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the placement has been approved by the court;(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW 74.15.190;(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders operated by or under contract with the department;(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter;(o)(i) A host home program, and host home, operated by a tax exempt organization for youth not in the care of or receiving services from the department except as provided in (o)(iii) of this subsection (((2)(o)(iii) of this section [(o)(iii) of this subsection])), if that program: (A) Recruits and screens potential homes in the program, including performing background checks on individuals over the age of ((eighteen))18 residing in the home through the Washington state patrol or equivalent law enforcement agency and performing physical inspections of the home; (B) screens and provides case management services to youth in the program; (C) obtains a notarized permission slip or limited power of attorney from the parent or legal guardian of the youth authorizing the youth to participate in the program and the authorization is updated every six months when a youth remains in a host home longer than six months, unless there is a compelling reason to not contact the parent or guardian; (D) obtains insurance for the program through an insurance provider authorized under Title 48 RCW; (E) provides mandatory reporter and confidentiality training; and (F) registers with the secretary of state under RCW 74.15.315.(ii) If a host home program serves a child without parental authorization who is seeking or receiving protected health care services, the host home program must:(A) Report to the department within 72 hours of the youth's participation in the program and following this report the department shall make a good faith attempt to notify the parent of this report and offer services designed to resolve the conflict and accomplish a reunification of the family;(B) Report to the department the youth's participation in the host home program at least once every month when the youth remains in the host home longer than one month; and(C) Provide case management outside of the host home and away from any individuals residing in the home at least once per month.(iii) A host home program and host home that meets the other requirements of this subsection (2)(o) ((of this section [this subsection (2)(o)])) may provide care for a youth who is receiving services from the department if the youth is:(A) Not subject to a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW; and(B) Seeking or receiving protected health care services.(iv) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(A) "Host home" means a private home that volunteers to host youth in need of temporary placement that is associated with a host home program.(B) "Host home program" is a program that provides support to individual host homes and meets the requirements of (o)(i) of this subsection.(C) "Compelling reason" means the youth is in the host home or seeking placement in a host home while seeking or receiving protected health care services.(D) "Protected health care services" means gender-affirming treatment as defined in RCW 74.09.675 and reproductive health care services as defined in RCW 74.09.875.(v) Any host home program that receives local, state, or government funding shall report the following information to the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs annually by December 1st of each year: The number of children the program served, why the child was placed with a host home, and where the child went after leaving the host home((,)) including, but not limited to, returning to the parents, running away, reaching the age of majority, or becoming a dependent of the state;(p) Receiving centers as defined in RCW 7.68.380.(3) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of ((twenty-one))21 who has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department under RCW 13.40.185.(5) "Performance-based contracts" or "contracting" means the structuring of all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable outcomes. Contracts may also include provisions that link the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of the reimbursement.(6) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.(7) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be maintained by an agency.(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.(9) (("Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her legally authorized residence.(10))) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the extent funds are available, the following:(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and computational skills training, either in local alternative or public high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to obtaining a high school equivalency degree;(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and placement programs;(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care, access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;(d) Individual and group counseling; and(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment and training administration programs including the workforce innovation and opportunity act, which administers private industry councils and the job corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Section 12 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---